Tennessee, session 114, SB1964.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-104-101(8), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (A) and adding the following new subdivision:
(B) Notwithstanding subdivision (8)(A), from May 1, 2026, through January 31,
2027, "seasonal retailer" means any person engaged in the business of making retail
sales of fireworks within this state from May 20 through May 30, June 10 through July
10, September 1 through September 10, and December 10 through January 3. This
subdivision (8)(B) is repealed on February 1, 2027;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-104-102(d), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1)(E), the fee for a seasonal retailer permit
for calendar year 2026 is one hundred fifty dollars ($150). This subdivision (d)(3) is
repealed on February 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. The state fire marshal is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate this
act. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures
Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1964
009790
- 1 -